Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.20.110

Subpoenas. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) The commission may apply for and obtain a superior court order approving and authorizing a subpoena in advance of its issuance. The application may be made in Thurston county, the county where the subpoenaed person resides or is found, or the county where the subpoenaed documents, records, or evidence are located. The application must:

(a) State that an order is sought under this section;

(b) Adequately specify the documents, records, evidence, or testimony; and

(c) Include a declaration made under oath that an investigation is being conducted for a lawfully authorized purpose related to an investigation within the commission's authority and that the subpoenaed documents, records, evidence, or testimony are reasonably related to an investigation within the commission's authority.

(2) When an application under this section is made to the satisfaction of the court, the court must issue an order approving the subpoena. An order under this subsection constitutes authority of law for the agency to subpoena the documents, records, evidence, or testimony.

(3) The commission may seek approval and a court may issue an order under this section without prior notice to any person, including the person to whom the subpoena is directed and the person who is the subject of an investigation. An application for court approval is subject to the fee and process set forth in RCW 36.18.012(3).

[ 2024 c 164 s 417; 2019 c 428 s 9. Formerly RCW 42.17A.160.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Finding—2019 c 428: "The legislature finds that passage of chapter 304, Laws of 2018 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2938) and chapter 111, Laws of 2018 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5991) was an important step in achieving the goals of reforming campaign finance reporting and oversight, including simplifying the reporting and enforcement processes to promote administrative efficiencies. Much has been accomplished in the short time the public disclosure commission has implemented these new laws. However, some additional improvements were identified by the legislature, stakeholders, and the public disclosure commission, that are necessary to further implement these goals and the purpose of the state campaign finance law. Additional refinements to the law will help to ensure the public disclosure commission may continue to provide transparency of election campaign funding activities, meaningful guidance to participants in the political process, and enforcement that is timely, fair, and focused on improving compliance." [ 2019 c 428 s 1.]

Effective date—2019 c 428: "Except for sections 35 and 36 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 21, 2019]." [ 2019 c 428 s 44.]